California, session 20252026, AB757.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 42130 of the Education Code is amended to read:42130. (a) The superintendent of each school district shall, in addition to any other powers and duties granted to or imposed upon him or her, them, submit two reports to the governing board of the school district during each fiscal year. The first report shall cover the financial and budgetary status of the district for the period ending October 31. The second report shall cover the period ending January 31. Both reports shall be approved by the district governing board no later than 45 days after the close of the period being reported. All reports required by this subdivision shall be in a format or on forms prescribed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, Superintendent, and shall be based on standards and criteria for fiscal stability adopted by the State Board of Education state board pursuant to Section 33127. The reports, and supporting data, shall be maintained and made available by the school district for public review.(b) (1) For those years in which no regular election for members of the governing board of the school district is conducted, the governing board of the school district shall approve both reports no later than 45 days after the close of the period being reported.(2) Consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 35143, for those years in which a regular election for members of the governing board of the school district is conducted, the governing board of the school district shall do both of the following:(A) Approve the report for the period ending October 31 no later than December 20.(B) Approve the report for the period ending January 31 within 45 days of January 31.